District of Columbia statutes.
38-1101

Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

The term “Federal City College” means the public college of arts and sciences established pursuant to this subchapter. Such college shall be organized and administered to provide:

(A)

A 4-year program in the liberal arts and sciences acceptable toward a bachelor of arts degree, including courses in teacher education;

(B)

A 2-year program:

(i)

Which is acceptable for full credit toward a bachelor’s degree or for a degree of associate in arts, and which may include courses in business education, secretarial training, and business administration; or

(ii)

In engineering, mathematics or the physical and biological sciences which is designed to prepare a student to work as a technician or at a semiprofessional level in engineering, sciences, or other technical fields which require the understanding and application of basic engineering, scientific, or mathematical principles or knowledge;

(C)

Educational programs of study as may be acceptable for a master’s degree; and

(D)

Courses on an individual, noncredit basis to those desiring to further their education without seeking a degree.

(2)

The term “Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

(3)

The term “Board” means the Board of Higher Education established in § 38-1102.

(4)

The term “Board of Education” means the Board of Education of the District of Columbia established by § 1-204.95 [repealed].

History

Nov. 7, 1966, 80 Stat. 1426, Pub. L. 89-791, title I, § 101

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1401.
1973 Ed., § 31-1601.

References in Text

The Federal City College, referred to throughout this subchapter, has been absorbed into the University of the District of Columbia pursuant to Chapter 12 of this title.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.